Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.095

Civil fines.

This section governs the assessment of a civil fine against a person by the department. This section does not govern actions taken under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1) The department shall give written notice to the person against whom it assesses a civil fine. The notice shall state the reasons for the adverse action. The notice shall be personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil action or shall be given in an other [another] manner that shows proof of receipt.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the civil fine is due and payable twenty-eight days after receipt. The department may make the date the fine is due later than twenty-eight days after receipt. When the department does so, it shall state the effective date in the written notice given the person against whom it assesses the fine.

(3) The person against whom the department assesses a civil fine has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The application must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the fine, include a copy of the adverse notice, be served on and received by the department within twenty-eight days of the person's receiving the notice of civil fine, and be served in a manner which shows proof of receipt.

(4) If the person files a timely and sufficient appeal, the department shall not implement the action until the final order has been served. The presiding or reviewing officer may permit the department to implement part or all of the action while the proceedings are pending if the appellant causes an unreasonable delay in the proceedings or for other good cause.

[ 1991 c 3 s 378.]